District of Columbia statutes.
12-103

Judgment and costs in case of new party.

In all cases where a new party is made to an action, the costs which accrued before the new party was made to the action shall be taxed as part of the costs in the action, and the judgment rendered shall be the same as if the action had been originally commenced between persons who are parties to the action. A defendant who is made a new party to the action may not be burdened with debts, damages, or costs beyond the amount of property or assets that have descended or come to his hands from the deceased.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 509, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 12-103.
1973 Ed., § 12-103.